Missouri, session 2026, HB2209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 170.011 and 170.345, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 170.011 and 170.345, to read as follows:
170.011. 1. (1) Regular courses of instruction in the Constitution of the United
States and of the state of Missouri and in American history and institutions shall be given in
all public and private schools in the state of Missouri, except proprietary schools, and shall
begin not later than the seventh grade and continue in high school to an extent determined by
the state commissioner of education, and shall continue in college and university courses to
an extent determined by the state commissioner of higher education.
(2) In [the 1990-91] each school year[ and each year thereafter], local school districts
maintaining high schools shall comply with the provisions of this section by offering in grade
nine, ten, eleven, or twelve a course of instruction in the institutions, branches, and functions
of the government of the state of Missouri, including local governments, and of the
government of the United States, and in the electoral process. A local school district
maintaining [such] a high school shall require that prior to the completion of the twelfth grade
each pupil who receives a high school diploma or certificate of graduation [on or after
January 1, 1994,] shall satisfactorily complete such a course of study. Such course shall be of
at least [one semester in length and may be two] four semesters [in] or a substantially
equivalent length. The department of elementary and secondary education may provide
assistance in developing such a course if the district requests assistance.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2209 2
(3) A school district may elect to waive the requirements of this subsection for any
student who transfers from outside the state to a Missouri high school if the student can
furnish documentation deemed acceptable by the school district of the student's successful
completion in any year from the ninth through the twelfth grade of a course of instruction of
four semesters or a substantially equivalent length in the institutions, branches, and
functions of state government, including local governments, and of the government of the
United States, and in the electoral process.
2. American history courses at the elementary and secondary levels shall include in
their proper time-line sequence specific referrals to the details and events of the racial
equality movement that have caused major changes in United States and Missouri laws and
attitudes.
3. No pupil shall receive a certificate of graduation from any public or private school
other than private trade schools unless he or she has satisfactorily passed an examination on
the provisions and principles of the Constitution of the United States and of the state of
Missouri, and in American history, American institutions, and American civics. A school
district may elect to waive the requirements of this subsection for any student who transfers
from outside the state to a Missouri high school if the student can furnish documentation
deemed acceptable by the school district of the student's successful completion in any year
from the ninth through the twelfth grade of a course of instruction in the institutions,
branches, and functions of state government, including local governments, and of the
government of the United States, and in the electoral process. A student of a college or
university, who, after having completed a course of instruction prescribed in this section and
successfully passed an examination on the United States Constitution, and in American
history and American institutions required hereby, transfers to another college or university, is
not required to complete another such course or pass another such examination as a condition
precedent to his graduation from the college or university.
4. [In the 1990-91 school year and each year thereafter,] Each school district
maintaining a high school may annually nominate to the state board of education a student
who has demonstrated knowledge of the principles of government and citizenship through
academic achievement, participation in extracurricular activities, and service to the
community. Annually, the state board of education shall select fifteen students from those
nominated by the local school districts and shall recognize and award them for their academic
achievement, participation and service.
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply to students from foreign countries
who are enrolled in public or private high schools in Missouri, if such students are foreign
exchange students sponsored by a national organization recognized by the department of
elementary and secondary education.

HB 2209 3
170.345. 1. This section shall be known as the "Missouri Civics Education
Initiative".
2. Any student entering the ninth grade after July 1, 2017, who is attending any
public, charter, or private school, except private trade schools, as a condition of high school
graduation shall pass an examination on the provisions and principles of American civics.
3. The examination shall consist of one hundred questions similar to the one hundred
questions used by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) that are
administered to applicants for United States citizenship.
4. The examination required under this section [may be included in any other
examination that is administered on the provisions and principles of the Constitution of the
United States and of the state of Missouri, and in American history and American institutions,
as required in subsection 3 of section 170.011] shall be administered after a student has
completed four semesters or a substantially equivalent length relating to civics
education.
5. School districts may use any online test to comply with the provisions of this
section.
6. Each school district shall adopt a policy to permit the waiver of the requirements of
this section for any student with a disability if recommended by the student's IEP committee.
For purposes of this subsection, "IEP" means individualized education program.
✔